Florida, session 2026, HB615.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of section
1003.57, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1003.57 Exceptional students instruction.—
(1)
(c)1. A student may not be given special instruction or
services as an exceptional student until after he or she has
been properly evaluated and found eligible as an exceptional
student in the manner prescribed by rules of the State Board of
Education.
2. In accordance with rules of the State Board of
Education, a school district must complete an initial evaluation
to determine whether a student is eligible for an individual
education plan (IEP) within 60 calendar days after receiving
parental consent to perform such evaluation. The school district
must convene an IEP team meeting within 30 calendar days after
eligibility is determined. The notification and written plan
must be retained in the student's educational record.
3. The parent of an exceptional student evaluated and
found eligible or ineligible shall be notified of each such
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb615-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 615 2026
evaluation and determination. Such notice shall contain a
statement informing the parent that he or she is entitled to a
due process hearing on the identification, evaluation, and
eligibility determination, or lack thereof. Such hearings are
exempt from ss. 120.569, 120.57, and 286.011, except to the
extent that the State Board of Education adopts rules
establishing other procedures. Any records created as a result
of such hearings are confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1).
The hearing must be conducted by an administrative law judge
from the Division of Administrative Hearings pursuant to a
contract between the Department of Education and the Division of
Administrative Hearings. The decision of the administrative law
judge is final, except that any party aggrieved by the finding
and decision rendered by the administrative law judge has the
right to bring a civil action in the state circuit court. In
such an action, the court shall receive the records of the
administrative hearing and shall hear additional evidence at the
request of either party. In the alternative, in hearings
conducted on behalf of a student who is identified as gifted,
any party aggrieved by the finding and decision rendered by the
administrative law judge has the right to request a review of
the administrative law judge's order by the district court of
appeal as provided in s. 120.68.
4. If a school or service provider is unable to provide a
related service identified in a student's IEP as scheduled, the
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb615-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 615 2026
school administrator or staffing specialist must notify the
parent in writing within 5 school days, explain the reason the
service was not provided, and provide a written plan for make-up
services.
5. A parent has the right to access, upon request, all
service logs within 15 school days after such service is
provided. The IEP team must inform parents of this right at each
IEP meeting.
6. Each school district shall provide an individualized
orientation to the parent of a student newly identified as
eligible for exceptional student education services. The school
district must obtain a signed acknowledgment from the parent
confirming that the orientation was provided in a format the
parent understands. Each school district shall notify parents
when refresher orientations are available each year. The
acknowledgment form must be retained in the student's education
records. The orientation must include all of the following:
a. An overview of procedural safeguards.
b. Parental rights and responsibilities.
c. Instructions on accessing and reviewing service logs.
d. Instructions on filing complaints with the school
district and the Department of Education.
Section 2. Section 1003.576, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
100 1003.576 Individual education plans for exceptional
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb615-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 615 2026
101 students.—
102 (1) The Department of Education must develop and have an
103 operating electronic individual education plan (IEP) IEP system
104 in place for statewide use. The statewide system shall be
105 developed collaboratively with school districts and must include
106 input from school districts currently developing or operating
107 electronic IEP systems.
108 (2) Each school district must develop a standardized
109 service log, which includes progress notes, for the provision of
110 related services as identified in the student's IEP, to be used
111 by school staff and service providers.
112 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb615-02-c2